Idaho, session 2026, H0670.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 50-2906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2906. PUBLIC HEARING AND ORDINANCE REQUIRED -- SPECIAL RULES FOR
CERTAIN TAXING DISTRICTS. (1) To adopt a new urban renewal plan or create
a competitively disadvantaged border community area containing a revenue
allocation financing provision, the local governing body of an authorized
municipality must enact an ordinance in accordance with chapter 9, title 50,
Idaho Code, and section 50-2008, Idaho Code. To modify an existing urban
renewal plan, to add or change a revenue allocation, an authorized munici-
pality must enact an ordinance in accordance with chapter 9, title 50, Idaho
Code, and conduct a public hearing as provided in section 50-2008(c), Idaho
Code. No urban renewal project, plan, competitively disadvantaged border
community area or modification thereto, or revenue allocation financial
provision shall be held ineffective for failure to comply with the require-
ments of this section if compliance with the section is substantial and in
good faith and administrative authority of both the local governing body
and urban renewal agency does not extend beyond the municipal boundary of
the authorized municipality. Urban renewal plans and revenue allocation
financing provisions may be held ineffective if an urban renewal area or rev-
enue allocation area extends outside the municipal boundary of an authorized
municipality and a transfer of powers ordinance has not been adopted by the
cooperating county.
(2) A revenue allocation financing provision adopted in accordance
with this chapter shall be effective retroactively to January 1 of the year
in which the local governing body of the authorized municipality enacts such
ordinance.
(3)(a) Prior to taking action on an ordinance to adopt a revenue alloca-
tion financing provision, the local governing body of an authorized mu-
nicipality shall prepare a notice stating:
(i) That an urban renewal plan or modification thereto or a com-
petitively disadvantaged border community area has been proposed
and is being considered for adoption, and that such plan or modi-
fication thereto or proposal to create a competitively disadvan-
taged border community area contains a revenue allocation financ-
ing provision that will cause property taxes resulting from any
increases in equalized assessed valuation in excess of the equal-
ized assessed valuation as shown on the base assessment roll to be


allocated to the agency for urban renewal and competitively disad-
vantaged border community area purposes;
(ii) That an agreement on the administration of a revenue alloca-
tion financing provision extending beyond the municipal boundary
of the authorized municipality has been negotiated with the coop-
erating county having extraterritorial power and that the agree-
ment has been formalized by a transfer of power ordinance adopted
by that county; and
(iii) That a public hearing on such plan or modification will be
held by the local governing body pursuant to section 50-2008(c),
Idaho Code.
(b) The notice shall also state the time, date, and place of the hear-
ing. At least thirty (30) days but not more than sixty (60) days prior
to the date set for final reading of the ordinance, the local governing
body shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation and
transmit the notice, together with a copy of the plan and recommenda-
tion of the urban renewal agency or the municipality which by ordinance
created the competitively disadvantaged border community area, to the
governing body of each taxing district which levies taxes upon any tax-
able property in the revenue allocation area and which would be affected
by the revenue allocation financing provision of the urban renewal plan
proposed to be approved by the local governing body.
(4) No fire protection district or ambulance service district shall be
subject to the financing provisions of an urban renewal revenue allocation
area, or any modification thereof, created or modified after July 1, 2025,
unless the local governing body of the authorized municipality proposing to
create or modify such financing provision requests such district to consent
to be subject to the financing provision and the district receiving such
request consents. To request such a district to consent, the local governing
body of an authorized municipality shall send a request to the district at
the same time it sends notice to taxing districts of its intent to create or
modify an urban renewal plan that includes a revenue allocation financing
provision pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. If the governing board
of the district receiving a request to consent agrees with the request, it
shall adopt a resolution providing that such district shall be subject to
the financing provisions of the proposed urban renewal area plan or proposed
urban renewal area plan modification that was identified in the request, and
shall thereafter be subject to such financing provision. The consenting
district shall, within ten (10) business days, file a copy of the resolution
with the local governing body of the authorized municipality. Upon receipt
of the district's resolution consenting to be subject to the financing pro-
vision, the governing body of the municipality shall transmit a copy of such
resolution to the county clerk and the state tax commission within ten (10)
business days.
(5)(a) Any fire protection district or ambulance service district may
withdraw from being subject to an urban renewal revenue allocation fi-
nancing provision under an urban renewal plan established by local gov-
erning body ordinance prior to July 1, 2025, if the urban renewal plan
establishing the revenue allocation financing provision does not have
any outstanding bonds, contractual obligations, or other indebtedness


being funded by such revenue allocation financing provision greater
than the amount of the revenue allocation proceeds that was attribut-
able to the fire protection district or ambulance service district as of
December 31 of the immediate prior tax year.
(b) Any fire protection district or ambulance service district that
seeks to withdraw shall:
(i) By May 1 of the withdrawal year request an accounting from
the county showing the amount of revenue allocation proceeds that
was attributable to the fire protection district or ambulance ser-
vice district as of December 31 of the immediate prior tax year. A
copy of the accounting shall be simultaneously transmitted by the
county to the requesting district and the agency within fifteen
(15) days of receipt of the request from the district; and
(ii) By June 1 of the withdrawal year adopt a resolution express-
ing an intent to withdraw and transmit the same to the urban re-
newal agency that governs the urban renewal plan and revenue al-
location financing provision that the district seeks to withdraw
from.
(c) The agency shall schedule a special meeting within ten (10) busi-
ness days of receipt of the fire protection district's or ambulance ser-
vice district's resolution approving the withdrawal and the accounting
from the county to accept the request to withdraw by agency resolution,
or to deny the request to withdraw in writing due to the existence of
outstanding bonds, contractual obligations, or other indebtedness be-
ing funded by the district's revenue allocation proceeds, and setting
forth specific information about the indebtedness.
(d) The agency shall not deny a fire protection district's or ambulance
service district's request to withdraw if there are no outstanding
bonds, contractual obligations, or other indebtedness being funded by
the district's revenue allocation proceeds or if the agency has suffi-
cient revenue allocation proceeds from other sources to satisfy current
outstanding bonds, contractual obligations, or other indebtedness.
(d) (e) If the withdrawal is accepted, the urban renewal agency shall
transmit a copy of the district resolution and the agency resolution to
the county clerk, the county recorder, and the state tax commission no
later than the fourth Monday of July. If the resolutions are received
by the state tax commission and the county by the fourth Monday of July,
then the levy rate for the next fiscal year will be calculated pursuant
to section 50-2908(1)(g), Idaho Code, and any budget increases as set
forth in sections 63-802 and 63-301A, Idaho Code. If the resolutions
are transmitted to the county clerk, the county recorder, and the state
tax commission after the fourth Monday of July, then the effect of the
withdrawal will be the following tax year.
(f) For the purposes of this subsection, "contractual obligation"
means an obligation expressly set forth in a written contract or other
written agreement that is executed by the parties to such contract or
agreement.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.